Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Automated driving system. new text end new text begin "Automated driving system" means the hardware and software that are collectively capable of performing the entire dynamic driving task on a sustained basis, regardless of whether the dynamic driving task is limited to a specific operational design domain. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Autonomous vehicle. new text end new text begin "Autonomous vehicle" means a motor vehicle equipped with an automated driving system designed to function as a level 4 or 5 system under SAE J3016. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 24a. new text end new text begin Dynamic driving task. new text end new text begin (a) "Dynamic driving task" means the real-time operational and tactical functions required to operate a vehicle in on-road traffic, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) lateral vehicle motion control via steering; new text end new text begin (2) longitudinal motion control via acceleration and deceleration; new text end new text begin (3) monitoring the driving environment via object and event detection, recognition, classification, and response preparation; new text end new text begin (4) object and event response execution; new text end new text begin (5) maneuver planning; and new text end new text begin (6) enhancing conspicuity via lighting, signaling, and gesturing. new text end new text begin (b) Dynamic driving task does not include strategic functions such as trip scheduling and selection of destinations and waypoints. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 24b. new text end new text begin Dynamic driving task fallback. new text end new text begin "Dynamic driving task fallback" means: new text end new text begin (1) the response by the person or human driver to either perform the dynamic driving task or achieve a minimal risk condition after occurrence of a dynamic driving task performance-relevant system failure or upon operational design domain exit; and new text end new text begin (2) the response by an automated driving system to achieve minimal risk condition, given the same circumstances. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 29a. new text end new text begin First responder interaction plan. new text end new text begin "First responder interaction plan" means a document of procedures specifying how first responders should interact with an autonomous vehicle that, at a minimum, describes: new text end new text begin (1) how to communicate with a fleet support specialist who is available during the times the autonomous vehicle is in operation; new text end new text begin (2) how to safely remove the autonomous vehicle from the roadway and steps to safely tow the vehicle; new text end new text begin (3) how to recognize whether the autonomous vehicle is in autonomous mode; and new text end new text begin (4) any additional information the person operating the autonomous vehicle, manufacturer of the autonomous vehicle, or manufacturer of the automated driving system deems necessary regarding hazardous conditions or public safety risks associated with the operation of the autonomous vehicle. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 34a. new text end new text begin Human driver. new text end new text begin "Human driver" means a natural person in a vehicle with a valid license to operate a motor vehicle who controls all or part of the dynamic driving task. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 40c. new text end new text begin Minimal risk condition. new text end new text begin "Minimal risk condition" means a condition to which a person, a human driver, or an automated driving system may bring a vehicle after performing the dynamic driving task fallback in order to reduce the risk of a crash when a given trip cannot or should not be completed. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 49a. new text end new text begin On-demand autonomous vehicle network. new text end new text begin "On-demand autonomous vehicle network" means a transportation service network that uses a software application or other digital means to dispatch or otherwise enable the prearrangement of transportation with autonomous vehicles for purposes of transporting passengers or goods, including for-hire transportation and transportation of passengers or goods for compensation. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 50a. new text end new text begin Operational design domain. new text end new text begin "Operational design domain" means the operating conditions under which an automated driving system is specifically designed to function, including but not limited to environmental, geographical, and time-of-day restrictions and the requisite presence or absence of certain traffic or roadway characteristics. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 70a. new text end new text begin SAE J3016. new text end new text begin "SAE J3016" means the April 2021 revision of the Taxonomy and Definitions for Terms Related to Driving Automation Systems for On-Road Motor Vehicles published by SAE International. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [169.251] OPERATION OF AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Autonomous vehicle requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A person must not cause or allow an autonomous vehicle to operate on the public roads of Minnesota with the automated driving system engaged unless the vehicle meets the conditions in this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) If a failure of the automated driving system occurs that renders that system unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task relevant to the automated driving system's intended operational design domain, the autonomous vehicle must achieve a minimal risk condition. new text end new text begin (c) The autonomous vehicle must be capable of operating in compliance with the applicable traffic and motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of Minnesota when reasonable to do so, except when an exemption has been granted by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) When required by federal law, the autonomous vehicle must have the required manufacturer's certification label indicating that, at the time of the autonomous vehicle's manufacture, the autonomous vehicle has been certified to be in compliance with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards, including reference to any exemption granted by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration. new text end new text begin (e) The autonomous vehicle owner or the automated driving system operator must provide proof of financial responsibility that satisfies the requirements of section 169.253. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Operating an autonomous vehicle without a human driver. new text end new text begin (a) A person must not cause or allow an autonomous vehicle to operate on the public roads of Minnesota without a human driver, unless: new text end new text begin (1) the automated vehicle satisfies the requirements of subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (2) the person receives and maintains authorization from the commissioner to operate autonomous vehicles without a human driver; and new text end new text begin (3) the person provides the commissioner and the commissioner of public safety with a first responder interaction plan. new text end new text begin (b) A person seeking authorization to operate an autonomous vehicle without a human driver must submit an application to the commissioner with the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the name, address, and principal point of contact for the person applying for authorization; new text end new text begin (2) the vehicle information for each autonomous vehicle to be operated under the authorization; new text end new text begin (3) a written statement certifying that each autonomous vehicle in clause (2) complies with subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (4) a first responder interaction plan. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must verify that an application submitted under paragraph (b) is complete and accurate and approve the application within 30 days of receipt. The commissioner must deny incomplete or inaccurate applications within 30 days of receipt. new text end new text begin (d) An authorization issued by the commissioner under this subdivision does not expire and remains active unless suspended, revoked, or canceled by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (e) The authorization holder must provide the commissioner with an update to the information described in paragraph (b) no later than 30 days after the information materially changes. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner may immediately suspend, revoke, or cancel the authorization issued under paragraph (c) if the authorization holder fails to comply with paragraph (e). The commissioner must promptly rescind the suspension, revocation, or cancellation upon receiving the updated information. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Human drivers permitted to operate. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section prohibits or restricts a human driver from operating an autonomous vehicle equipped with controls that permit the human driver to take control of part or all of the dynamic driving task. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Definition of driver; licensure of autonomous vehicles. new text end new text begin When an automated driving system installed on an autonomous vehicle is engaged and no human driver is present: new text end new text begin (1) the person who receives authorization under subdivision 2 to operate an autonomous vehicle may be issued a citation or other applicable penalty if the autonomous vehicle fails to comply with traffic or motor vehicle laws; new text end new text begin (2) except as provided in clause (1), the automated driving system is considered the driver of the autonomous vehicle for the purpose of assessing compliance with applicable traffic or motor vehicle laws and is deemed to electronically satisfy all physical acts required by a driver or operator of the vehicle; and new text end new text begin (3) an automated driving system is considered to be licensed to operate an autonomous vehicle under chapter 171 if the autonomous vehicle has been authorized by the commissioner under subdivision 2. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [169.252] COLLISIONS INVOLVING AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES. new text end new text begin In the event of a collision involving an autonomous vehicle: new text end new text begin (1) a human driver of an autonomous vehicle must comply with the requirements of section 169.09; new text end new text begin (2) an autonomous vehicle without a human driver must remain on the scene of the crash when required by section 169.09, consistent with the autonomous vehicle's capability under section 169.251; and new text end new text begin (3) the person authorized to operate an autonomous vehicle without a human driver under section 169.251 must report any collision involving the autonomous vehicle consistent with section 169.09. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [169.253] FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin (a) The owner of an autonomous vehicle must maintain proof of financial responsibility in the same form and at the same minimum limits required for a motor vehicle under sections 65B.48 and 65B.49. new text end new text begin (b) A person must not operate an autonomous vehicle with the automated driving system engaged unless the person maintains proof of financial responsibility for the autonomous vehicle in an amount not less than $1,000,000 combined single limit per occurrence for third-party liability. Proof of financial responsibility under this paragraph must also satisfy basic economic loss benefits and uninsured motorist benefits as required under section 65B.49 when the requirements are not satisfied by insurance policies or self-insurance required under paragraph (a). Insurance policies and self-insurance applicable under paragraph (a) and this paragraph may contract and coordinate with each other to determine which will satisfy personal injury protection and uninsured motorist benefit requirements. The satisfaction of financial responsibility under this paragraph satisfies financial responsibility under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) Financial responsibility under paragraph (b) may be satisfied by: new text end new text begin (1) an insurance policy issued by an insurer licensed in Minnesota; or new text end new text begin (2) a policy issued by an eligible surplus lines insurer pursuant to sections 60A.195 to 60A.2095. new text end new text begin (d) No higher limits of insurance or additional coverages are required solely due to a vehicle's use of an automated driving system other than the financial responsibility minimum requirement under paragraph (b). new text end Sec. 14. new text begin [169.254] ON-DEMAND AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE NETWORK. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin On-demand autonomous vehicle network permitted; requirements. new text end new text begin (a) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network may transport passengers or goods in Minnesota, including for-hire, if the on-demand autonomous vehicle network complies with the requirements of sections 169.251 to 169.257. new text end new text begin (b) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network vehicle must not accept requests for service via traditional street hail. new text end new text begin (c) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network vehicle must not park unlawfully on any public way for a time longer than is reasonably necessary to pick up or drop off passengers. new text end new text begin (d) An on-demand autonomous vehicle network must disclose to the rider the fare or fare calculator method on the network's website or within the online-enabled technology application service before the beginning of a prearranged ride. new text end new text begin (e) Within a reasonable period after the completion of a ride, an on-demand autonomous vehicle network must transmit an electronic receipt to the rider that lists: new text end new text begin (1) the origin and destination of the ride; new text end new text begin (2) the total time and distance of the ride; and new text end new text begin (3) the total fare paid. new text end new text begin (f) At all times while an autonomous vehicle is active on an on-demand autonomous vehicle network, the vehicle must display a consistent and distinctive signage or emblem. Acceptable forms of distinctive signage include but are not limited to symbols or signs on vehicle doors, roofs, or grilles, including magnetic or other removable signs or symbols. new text end new text begin (g) An autonomous vehicle must be inspected to confirm the vehicle is in good working condition before being put into service on any on-demand autonomous vehicle network and must be inspected annually thereafter. The on-demand autonomous vehicle network must maintain documentation of autonomous vehicle inspections for three years. new text end new text begin (h) If an on-demand autonomous vehicle network cannot provide a wheelchair-accessible transportation network vehicle, the network must direct the request to a provider of wheelchair-accessible vehicles if reasonably available. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Not a common carrier. new text end new text begin An on-demand autonomous vehicle network is not a common carrier or ground carrier. Chapter 221 does not apply to on-demand autonomous vehicle networks. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin [169.255] OPERATION OF COMMERCIAL AUTONOMOUS VEHICLES. new text end new text begin (a) An autonomous vehicle authorized to operate under section 169.251 that is also a commercial motor vehicle must operate pursuant to state laws governing the operation of commercial motor vehicles, except that any provision that by its nature reasonably applies only to a human driver does not apply to an autonomous vehicle operating without a human driver. new text end new text begin (b) For an autonomous vehicle that is also a commercial motor vehicle, physical parts of the automated driving system are considered a mirror or similar device for purposes of measuring the width of the vehicle. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin [169.256] AUTONOMOUS VEHICLE EQUIPMENT STANDARDS. new text end new text begin An autonomous vehicle that is designed to be operated exclusively without a human driver for all trips is not subject to motor vehicle equipment laws or regulations of Minnesota that: new text end new text begin (1) relate to or support motor vehicle operation by a human driver seated in the vehicle; and new text end new text begin (2) by their nature, are not relevant for an automated driving system. new text end Sec. 17. new text begin [169.257] CONTROLLING AUTHORITY. new text end new text begin (a) Unless otherwise provided in this chapter and notwithstanding any other provision of law, autonomous vehicles, automated driving systems, and on-demand autonomous vehicle networks are governed exclusively by state law. Any local ordinance that conflicts with state law is preempted. new text end new text begin (b) A political subdivision, municipality, or local entity must not impose additional requirements or restrictions specific to the operation of autonomous vehicles or automated driving systems. new text end new text begin (c) A political subdivision, municipality, or local entity must not require a license or permit or impose a tax, rate, or fee for the operation of an on-demand vehicle network that is specific to the operation of an on-demand autonomous vehicle network. new text end new text begin (d) This section does not prohibit an airport from imposing reasonable fees on an on-demand vehicle network consistent with any fees charged to companies that provide similar services at the airport for the use of airport facilities. This section does not prohibit an airport from designating locations for staging, pickup, or other similar on-demand vehicle network operations at the airport, provided that the designated locations must be reasonably equivalent to those required of other passenger transportation services. new text end new text begin (e) This section does not exempt an on-demand autonomous vehicle network company from taxes of general applicability. new text end new text begin (f) This section does not prohibit any political subdivision from enforcing traffic and road rule ordinances. new text end